foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C4.lexc
LEXICON C4Vinf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^வேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^வோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^வாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^வீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^வீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^வான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^வாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^வர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ந்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^விந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விவேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விவோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விவாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விவீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விவீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விவான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விவாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விவர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விவார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விவார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^விும் #;

LEXICON ClassFour
தணி C4Vinf;
அணி C4Vinf;
கவி C4Vinf;
தளி C4Vinf;
அரி C4Vinf;
கழி C4Vinf;
தறி C4Vinf;
அவி C4Vinf;
கனி C4Vinf;
திணி C4Vinf;
அழி C4Vinf;
கிழி C4Vinf;
திரி C4Vinf;
அளி C4Vinf;
கினி C4Vinf;
துணி C4Vinf;
அறி C4Vinf;
குமி C4Vinf;
துமி C4Vinf;
இடி C4Vinf;
குவி C4Vinf;
தெரி C4Vinf;
இரி C4Vinf;
குழி C4Vinf;
தெளி C4Vinf;
இழி C4Vinf;
குனி C4Vinf;
தொழி C4Vinf;
இளி C4Vinf;
சக்களி C4Vinf;
நசி C4Vinf;
உமி C4Vinf;
சப்பளி C4Vinf;
நரி C4Vinf;
உரி C4Vinf;
சரி C4Vinf;
நலி C4Vinf;
உழி C4Vinf;
சழி C4Vinf;
நளி C4Vinf;
உறி C4Vinf;
சுரி C4Vinf;
நிமி C4Vinf;
எரி C4Vinf;
சுழி C4Vinf;
நுணி C4Vinf;
எளி C4Vinf;
செழி C4Vinf;
நெரி C4Vinf;
எறி C4Vinf;
செறி C4Vinf;
நெறி C4Vinf;
ஒசி C4Vinf;
சொரி C4Vinf;
நொசி C4Vinf;
ஒடி C4Vinf;
சொறி C4Vinf;
நொடி C4Vinf;
ஒலி C4Vinf;
ஞெமி C4Vinf;
படி C4Vinf;
ஒழி C4Vinf;
ஞெரி C4Vinf;
பதி C4Vinf;
ஒளி C4Vinf;
ஞெலி C4Vinf;
பரி C4Vinf;
கசி C4Vinf;
தடி C4Vinf;
பறி C4Vinf;
பிகி C4Vinf;
வடி C4Vinf;
பிணி C4Vinf;
வதி C4Vinf;
பிரி C4Vinf;
வரி C4Vinf;
விடி C4Vinf;
பிழி C4Vinf;
வலி C4Vinf;
பிறி C4Vinf;
வழி C4Vinf;
புரி C4Vinf;
விசி C4Vinf;
பொசி C4Vinf;
பொடி C4Vinf;
விரி C4Vinf;
பொலி C4Vinf;
பொதி C4Vinf;
விளி C4Vinf;
பொரி C4Vinf;
வெறி C4Vinf;
பொழி C4Vinf;
பொளி C4Vinf;
மசி C4Vinf;
மடி C4Vinf;
மரி C4Vinf;
மலி C4Vinf;
முசி C4Vinf;
முரி C4Vinf;
முடி C4Vinf;
முகி C4Vinf;
மறி C4Vinf;
அளை C4Vinf;
அறை C4Vinf;
இடை C4Vinf;
இணை C4Vinf;
இயை C4Vinf;
இரை C4Vinf;
இசை C4Vinf;
இழை C4Vinf;
இறை C4Vinf;
உகை C4Vinf;
உடை C4Vinf;
உதை C4Vinf;
உரை C4Vinf;
உலை C4Vinf;
உளை C4Vinf;
உறை C4Vinf;
கடை C4Vinf;
கதை C4Vinf;
கமை C4Vinf;
கரை C4Vinf;
கலை C4Vinf;
ஈ C4Vinf;
வீ C4Vinf;
தீ C4Vinf;
எழு C4Vinf;
அறு C4Vinf;
பகு C4Vinf;
புகு C4Vinf;
மிகு C4Vinf;
வகு C4Vinf;
விழு C4Vinf;
களை C4Vinf;
முழி C4Vinf;
கனை C4Vinf;
முளி C4Vinf;
அகை C4Vinf;
கிளை C4Vinf;
முறி C4Vinf;
அசை C4Vinf;
குடை C4Vinf;
முனி C4Vinf;
அடை C4Vinf;
குதை C4Vinf;
மெலி C4Vinf;
அணை C4Vinf;
குமை C4Vinf;
மொசி C4Vinf;
அமை C4Vinf;
குலை C4Vinf;
மொழி C4Vinf;
அரை C4Vinf;
குழை C4Vinf;
வசி C4Vinf;
அலை C4Vinf;
குறை C4Vinf;
சடை C4Vinf;
நிலை C4Vinf;
வனை C4Vinf;
சதை C4Vinf;
நிறை C4Vinf;
விடை C4Vinf;
சமை C4Vinf;
நினை C4Vinf;
விளை C4Vinf;
சிதை C4Vinf;
நுகை C4Vinf;
சிறை C4Vinf;
நுழை C4Vinf;
ஆராய் C4Vinf;
சுனை C4Vinf;
நை C4Vinf;
உய் C4Vinf;
தகை C4Vinf;
பசை C4Vinf;
உராய் C4Vinf;
தசை C4Vinf;
பறை C4Vinf;
ஊய் C4Vinf;
ததை C4Vinf;
பிணை C4Vinf;
ஓய் C4Vinf;
தரை C4Vinf;
புகை C4Vinf;
காய் C4Vinf;
தலை C4Vinf;
புதை C4Vinf;
சாய் C4Vinf;
தழை C4Vinf;
புரை C4Vinf;
தீய் C4Vinf;
தளை C4Vinf;
புளை C4Vinf;
துய் C4Vinf;
தறை C4Vinf;
புனை C4Vinf;
தேய் C4Vinf;
திகை C4Vinf;
மலை C4Vinf;
தொய் C4Vinf;
திதை C4Vinf;
மறை C4Vinf;
தோய் C4Vinf;
திரை C4Vinf;
மனை C4Vinf;
நோய் C4Vinf;
துணை C4Vinf;
மிசை C4Vinf;
பாய் C4Vinf;
துதை C4Vinf;
மிடை C4Vinf;
பிய் C4Vinf;
துலை C4Vinf;
மிலை C4Vinf;
புய் C4Vinf;
துவை C4Vinf;
முகை C4Vinf;
மலாய் C4Vinf;
துழை C4Vinf;
முழை C4Vinf;
மாய் C4Vinf;
துளை C4Vinf;
முளை C4Vinf;
முய் C4Vinf;
துனை C4Vinf;
முனை C4Vinf;
மேய் C4Vinf;
தொலை C4Vinf;
வகை C4Vinf;
வாய் C4Vinf;
நசை C4Vinf;
வசை C4Vinf;
விசாய் C4Vinf;
நமை C4Vinf;
வணை C4Vinf;
வீராய் C4Vinf;
நனை C4Vinf;
வரை C4Vinf;
வேய் C4Vinf;
நிரை C4Vinf;
வளை C4Vinf;
சார் C4Vinf;
நிமிர் C4Vinf;
அசர் C4Vinf;
சிதர் C4Vinf;
நிவர் C4Vinf;
அஞர் C4Vinf;
சுகிர் C4Vinf;
நுகர் C4Vinf;
அடர் C4Vinf;
சூா் C4Vinf;
நூர் C4Vinf;
அணர் C4Vinf;
சேர் C4Vinf;
நோ் C4Vinf;
அதிர் C4Vinf;
சோர் C4Vinf;
நவிர் C4Vinf;
அமர் C4Vinf;
நிமிர் C4Vinf;
அமா் C4Vinf;
பகர் C4Vinf;
ஞெமிர் C4Vinf;
அவிர் C4Vinf;
படர் C4Vinf;
தகர் C4Vinf;
இமிர் C4Vinf;
பவர் C4Vinf;
தவர் C4Vinf;
ஈர் C4Vinf;
பிதிர் C4Vinf;
தகர் C4Vinf;
உணர் C4Vinf;
புலா் C4Vinf;
தீர் C4Vinf;
உயா் C4Vinf;
பெயா் C4Vinf;
துணா் C4Vinf;
ஊா் C4Vinf;
பொதிர் C4Vinf;
துவா் C4Vinf;
ஏர் C4Vinf;
மல்லார் C4Vinf;
தெளிர் C4Vinf;
ஓர் C4Vinf;
மலிர் C4Vinf;
தொடர் C4Vinf;
கிளர் C4Vinf;
முதிர் C4Vinf;
நல்கூர் C4Vinf;
குதிர் C4Vinf;
வணர் C4Vinf;
நிகர் C4Vinf;
கூர் C4Vinf;
வார் C4Vinf;
கமழ் C4Vinf;
விளர் C4Vinf;
நிகழ் C4Vinf;
நெகிழ் C4Vinf;
கீழ் C4Vinf;
அமிழ் C4Vinf;
பீழ் C4Vinf;
குறழ் C4Vinf;
ஆழ் C4Vinf;
போழ் C4Vinf;
சூழ் C4Vinf;
இமிழ் C4Vinf;
முகிழ் C4Vinf;
தவழ் C4Vinf;
உறழ் C4Vinf;
வாழ் C4Vinf;
திகழ் C4Vinf;
கதழ் C4Vinf;
